Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 1

General Provisions

41-22-101. State farm.

The Tennessee rehabilitative initiative in correction (referred to in this part as TRICOR) board shall operate the state farm and all appurtenances to its full capacity in the cultivation and production of crops of the character and kind best suited to be grown and produced on the land, and for this purpose inmates of the penitentiaries shall be employed under such rules, regulations, and conditions as may be prescribed by the board.

Acts 1915, ch. 114, § 2; Shan., § 7581a3; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Code 1932, § 12181; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-401; Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 6; 1996, ch. 564, § 2.

Cross-References. Corrections volunteer services, title 41, ch. 10.

Hours of work, § 41-21-207.

Inmate labor for private purposes, §§ 41-2-148, 41-3-106.

Legislative guidelines concerning labor of inmates, § 41-1-402.

Tennessee rehabilitative initiative in correction board, § 41-22-404.

41-22-102. Construction of roads and buildings on state property.

The commissioner has the authority and power to construct with the labor of inmates of the penitentiary any and all roads that may be found necessary and of value to the state's properties, and to construct and build, if, in the commissioner's opinion, it is necessary, separate hospitals and necessary appurtenances for contagious diseases on the state's property, and pay for them out of the funds belonging to the institution.

Acts 1915, ch. 114, § 2; Shan., § 7581a4; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Code 1932, § 12182; T.C.A., (orig. ed.), § 41-402.

41-22-103. Improvements and repairs of Brushy Mountain property.

The commissioner may, during the summer season, provide employment for part of the inmates at the Brushy Mountain penitentiary in repairing or building any buildings that may be deemed necessary on the property, so that, in the event of the employment of a sufficient number of inmates of the Brushy Mountain penitentiary on the county roads, pikes, highways or railroads, the mining force at the Brushy Mountain penitentiary shall be reduced to not exceeding three hundred (300) men mining coal, burning coke and operating the mines during the road working season.

Acts 1915, ch. 114, § 10; Shan., § 7581a18; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Code 1932, § 12196; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-403.

41-22-104. Grading of railroads into state mines.

The commissioner of correction may contract with any railroad company to do the grading of any railroad extension into the coal lands of the state and, in case the state engages to do the grading, the working of the inmates upon grade work is authorized. The working of the inmates shall be under the commissioner.

The commissioner may accept, in remuneration for the grading, county bonds or first mortgage bonds of a railroad.

Acts 1915, ch. 114, § 11; Shan., § 7581a19; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Code 1932, § 12197; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-404.

41-22-105. Sale of products of inmate labor.

The commissioner is authorized to make contracts for the sale of coal and coke of the state mines and to dispose of all articles manufactured by the inmates for the state, to the best interests of the state, and pay the proceeds into the state treasury.

Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 18; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, § 9; Shan., § 7474; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; mod. Code 1932, § 12069; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-405.

41-22-106. Unlawful sales of coal or coal products.

It is unlawful for any coal or coal products mined or produced as a result of inmate labor from the state mines at Petros or any other state-owned property to be sold to anyone other than the state itself for its own consumption or to the political subdivisions of the state. It is further unlawful to ship any of the state coal or transport it from the state mines, except for the use of the state, its political subdivisions or for charitable purposes.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1937, ch. 104, §§ 2, 3; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 12201.1, 12201.2 (Williams, §§ 12201.2, 12201.3); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 41-406, 41-407; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Sale of waste material from mines, § 4-6-136.

41-22-107. Reports and settlement of mining accounts.

The mining engineer and other officials in charge of the mines, prisons and inmates shall make monthly reports to the commissioner of correction of all expenses, receipts and transactions connected with the mines, prisons and inmates. The commissioner shall make full and complete detailed reports of everything transpiring or connected with the state mines, prisons and inmates every three (3) months to the commissioner of revenue, and also make, at the same time, full settlements with the commissioner of revenue for all moneys received, or that should have been received, by the commissioner of correction and other state officials or agents connected with the state mines, prisons or inmates.

Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 18; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, § 9; Shan., § 7475; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Code 1932, § 12073; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-408.

41-22-108. [Reserved.]

The TRICOR board, with the approval of the governor, is authorized and directed to make contracts for the sale or manufacture of any article that may be manufactured in state shops. This section and §§ 41-22-110, 41-22-111, and 41-22-115 are subject in all respects to § 41-22-116.

Contracts for the sale or manufacture of such manufactured articles shall be made at such prices, and covering such periods of time, as in the opinion of the TRICOR board will best subserve and protect the interests of the state and the welfare of the inmates, subject to the rules and provisions set forth in §§ 41-22-110, 41-22-111, and 41-22-115.

Acts 1919, ch. 40, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 7581a23; Code 1932, § 12205; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 12205; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-410; Acts 1994, ch. 737, §§ 8, 9; 1996, ch. 564, § 2.

Cross-References. Sale of mine and industrial products, §§ 4-6-135 — 4-6-137.

41-22-110. Manufacturers for state.

In the event the authorities authorized and empowered in § 41-22-109 to make contracts for the sale or manufacture of the articles to be manufactured in accordance with the plan provided for in §§ 41-22-109 — 41-22-111 and 41-22-115, are not able, after reasonable effort, to make and enter into satisfactory contracts of this character, those authorities are then empowered and authorized to use and employ the inmates in the manufacture of some article or articles, for and on behalf of the state itself, under the same general conditions, restrictions and rules as provided in §§ 41-22-111 and 41-22-115, and the authorities are also empowered and authorized to purchase or rent all machinery and equipment necessary to install the plants and to purchase necessary material for carrying on such manufacturing business.

Acts 1919, ch. 40, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 7581a24; Code 1932, § 12206; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 12206; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-411.

41-22-111. Control of inmates retained by state.

By no contract shall the care, protection and discipline of the inmates be to any degree surrendered or delegated to anyone other than employees of the state, who, under the supervision of the commissioner of correction, with the approval of the governor, shall have charge and control of all these matters.

Acts 1919, ch. 40, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 7581a23; Code 1932, § 12205; C. Supp. 1950, § 12205; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-412.

41-22-112 — 41-22-114.
[Reserved.]

In order that any competition between the labor of inmates to be worked directly by and for the benefit of the state and free labor shall be reduced to its practical minimum, all reasonable efforts shall be made to dispose of the articles manufactured by inmates at such prices as will best protect the financial interests of the state.

Acts 1919, ch. 40, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 7581a23; Code 1932, § 12205; C. Supp. 1950, § 12205; Acts 1972, ch. 701, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-416.

41-22-116. Sale of prison-made goods in open market prohibited — Exceptions.

Except as provided in subsections (c)-(f), no goods, wares or merchandise manufactured, in whole or in part, by inmates, except inmates on parole or probation, shall be sold or offered for sale in this state by any person, firm, association or corporation or by any federal authority, state or political subdivision of the federal authority or state. Nothing in this section shall be construed to forbid the sale, exchange or disposition of those goods to any institution supported wholly or in part by funds derived from public taxation and operated under the supervision of the United States, the state of Tennessee, or any other state of the union, or any political subdivision thereof. In addition, goods, wares and merchandise may be offered for sale to private nonprofit corporations and charitable organizations that are duly chartered as such under the laws of the state of Tennessee and to private contractors if the goods purchased will subsequently be used by a public agency or a nonprofit organization.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), this section shall not be construed so as to limit the display and casual sale to the public of arts and crafts made by adult and juvenile inmates at any approved departmental outlets, art and craft exhibitions, state parks or any appropriate display or exhibition program.

The state or a prison contractor operating pursuant to the Private Prison Contracting Act of 1986, compiled in chapter 24 of this title, is authorized to develop industry programs in correctional facilities, pursuant to which inmates shall manufacture goods to be sold on the open market. No goods may be manufactured for sale on the open market pursuant to this section unless the goods are determined by the department of economic and community development to be goods not otherwise manufactured in Tennessee. For any programs for manufacture of goods for sale on the open market, the TRICOR board shall establish a wage rate for inmates and shall establish a rate of payment by inmates to reimburse the state for providing room and board.

The TRICOR board may contract with food processors for the purposes of processing and packaging agricultural products produced in whole or in part by inmates, except inmates on parole or probation, or exchanging the agricultural products for food products of comparable value.

The TRICOR board is authorized to develop joint ventures with private sector businesses upon such terms and conditions as the TRICOR board may deem to be in the best interest of the state. These ventures shall operate pursuant to the Private Sector Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Program (PS/PIEC) (P.L. 96-157, as amended) and in accordance with §§ 41-6-204, 41-6-205(a) and (c), 41-6-206 and 41-6-207. Section 41-6-205(b) also applies to ventures in which inmates are employed by private industries. Eligibility for participation will not be extended to those businesses that have ceased Tennessee operations within twenty-four (24) months of the initiation of the venture or during such venture. If the private sector business is doing business in Tennessee, the venture shall not cause the loss of jobs for Tennessee employees. Goods produced in these ventures may be sold on the open market.

The TRICOR board is authorized to develop policies for the sale of TRICOR products to state, city and county employees. Any products sold directly to these employees shall not be made available for commercial resale. The board shall designate two percent (2%) of total annual sales from state, city and county employees to inmate educational programs. Policies developed by the TRICOR board as authorized by this section shall be reviewed by the state and local government committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections prior to implementation of the sale of products to state, city and county employees. Policies developed by the TRICOR board shall take into account possible competition with retail merchants and the impact on state and local sales tax collections.

The TRICOR board is authorized to develop policies for the sale of goods, wares or merchandise to inmates who are within the custody of the department of correction.

Each violation of this section by a person, firm or corporation is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1937, ch. 67, §§ 1, 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 12206.1 (Williams, §§ 12209.3, 12209.4); Acts 1972, ch. 576, § 22; 1978, ch. 542, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-418; Acts 1986, ch. 932, § 16; 1987, ch. 238, § 1, 2; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1991, ch. 78, §§ 1-3; 1992, ch. 1022, § 5; 1994, ch. 737, §§ 11, 12; 1996, ch. 564, § 2; 2003, ch. 378, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 896, § 1; 2011, ch. 410, § 2(h); 2013, ch. 236, § 64; 2019, ch. 345, § 67.

Compiler's Notes. For notes on P.L. 96-157, referred to in this section, see 42 U.S.C. § 3711.

Provisions relating to prison-made goods may be found at 18 U.S.C. §§ 1761 et seq.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections” for “state government committee of the house of representatives” in (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Cross-References. Inmate-produced arts and crafts, title 41, ch. 6, part 3.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

Attorney General Opinions. Operation of prison industry program by privately managed prison, OAG 99-023, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 28 (2/9/99).

41-22-117. [Reserved.]

In order that inmates may be more profitably employed in TRICOR programs for their own welfare and the welfare of the state, the department of correction is directed to:

Employ personnel and purchase any necessary equipment and supplies for investigating and recording the essential facts in order to classify inmates according to:

Their individual capacities, achievements and aptitudes;

Their previous education, training and experience; and

Other mental, physical and social characteristics;

Establish educational classes supplementing and related to each of the TRICOR programs and services set up in §§ 41-22-118 — 41-22-124; and

Note the progress of inmates in these classes and programs.

Acts 1937, ch. 278, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1939, ch. 11, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 12209.1 (Williams, § 12209.6); impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-420; Acts 2003, ch. 187, § 5.

41-22-119. Purchase of articles by public agencies.

All departments, institutions, agencies and political subdivisions of this state, that are supported in whole or in part by the state shall purchase from the TRICOR board all articles required by these departments, institutions, agencies or political subdivisions of the state that are produced, repackaged, assembled, warehoused or manufactured by TRICOR with the labor of inmates confined within the institutions or elsewhere employed within this state; provided, that the articles are certified pursuant to procedures approved by the procurement commission as being of satisfactory quality, being reasonable in price and available.

In the procedures for certifying articles for purchase by state government, the procurement commission may consider, if it deems appropriate, the effect of certification on markets in the private sector; however, it is not the legislative intent that this effect, if considered, be a controlling factor in the board's decision.

The board shall appoint a certification committee consisting of, but not limited to, a representative from the TRICOR board, the departments of general services and finance and administration and the office of the comptroller of the treasury that will advise the board.

The TRICOR board shall submit requests for certification of articles together with supporting data regarding quality, price and availability pursuant to procedures approved by the procurement commission.

No article shall be purchased by any department, institution, agency or political subdivision of the state from any other source unless excepted from §§ 41-22-118 — 41-22-124.

Each member of the general assembly may purchase any office furniture and equipment manufactured by TRICOR for the purpose of furnishing the legislative offices of that member in the member's legislative district.

The competitive bidding procedures set forth in title 12, chapter 3, part 5 do not apply to the purchase of articles manufactured or grown by TRICOR and certified pursuant to procedures approved by the procurement commission.

Acts 1937, ch. 278, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1939, ch. 11, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 12209.2 (Williams, § 12209.7); impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; Acts 1974, ch. 669, § 1; 1981, ch. 332, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-421; Acts 1988, ch. 903, § 3; 1994, ch. 737, § 14; 1996, ch. 564, § 2; 1999, ch. 299, §§ 1-4; 1999, ch. 487, § 1; 2002, ch. 526, §§ 1-4; 2011, ch. 295, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. Subsection (g) formerly referred to the competitive bidding procedures set forth in “§ 12-3-204 et seq.,” which provisions were transferred in 1981 to title 12, ch. 3, part 5. Subsequently, former title 12, ch. 3 was amended and reorganized by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 8-70, effective July 1, 2013. Title 12, ch. 3, part 5 as amended provides for competitive solicitation procedures.

41-22-120. Agencies not required to purchase prison-made articles.

Exceptions from the operation of the mandatory provisions of §§ 41-22-118 — 41-22-124 may be made in any case where, in the opinion of the procurement commission, articles so produced or manufactured do not meet the reasonable requirements of a department, institution, agency or political subdivision of the state. No department, institution, agency or political subdivision may be allowed to evade the intent and meaning of this section by slight variations from standards adopted by the TRICOR board when articles produced or manufactured by it are certified pursuant to procedures approved by the procurement commission.

Acts 1937, ch. 278, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1939, ch. 11, §§ 1, 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 12209.3 (Williams, § 12209.8); impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; Acts 1981, ch. 332, § 22; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-422; Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 15; 1996, ch. 564, § 2; 2002, ch. 526, § 5; 2011, ch. 295, § 19.

41-22-121. Violations of § 41-22-120.

No voucher, certificate or warrant issued on the commissioner of finance and administration by any department, institution, agency or political subdivision shall be questioned by the commissioner or by the state treasurer on the grounds that § 41-22-120 has not been complied with by the department, institution, agency or political subdivision, but if intentional violation of § 41-22-120 by any department, institution, agency or political subdivision continues, after notice from the governor to desist, it constitutes a malfeasance in office and subjects the officer or officers or agents responsible for this violation to suspension or removal from office as may be provided by law in other cases of malfeasance.

Acts 1937, ch. 278, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 12209.4 (Williams, § 12209.9); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-423.

41-22-122. Catalogue of products.

The TRICOR board shall cause to be prepared annually, at such times as it may determine, catalogues containing the description of all articles and supplies manufactured and produced by it pursuant to the provisions of §§ 41-22-118 — 41-22-124, copies of which catalogues shall be sent by it to all departments, institutions, agencies and political subdivisions of the state referred to in §§ 41-22-118 — 41-22-121.

At least thirty (30) days before the commencement of each fiscal year, the proper official of each department, institution, agency or political subdivision shall report to TRICOR estimates for the fiscal year of the kind and amount of articles and supplies required by them for the ensuing year, referring such estimates to the catalogue issued by the TRICOR board insofar as articles and supplies indicated are included in that catalogue.

The catalogue shall identify those articles and supplies that are certified pursuant to procedures approved by the procurement commission as required by § 41-22-119.

Acts 1937, ch. 278, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1939, ch. 11, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 12209.5 (Williams, § 12209.10); impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; Acts 1981, ch. 332, § 23; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-424; Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 16; 1996, ch. 564, § 2; 2002, ch. 526, § 6; 2011, ch. 295, § 19.

41-22-123. Disposition of proceeds — Quarterly statement.

All receipts from the sale of prison products shall be placed to the credit of the TRICOR board, which, except as provided in this part, is authorized to expend such moneys from this fund as may be necessary to procure tools, supplies and materials, replace equipment and to employ personnel and otherwise defray the necessary expenses incident to the employment of inmates as provided in this part.

A profit and loss statement of TRICOR's operation shall be prepared quarterly, within the month following the end of the quarter, and a copy of this statement, certified by the fiscal officer of TRICOR, shall be sent to the comptroller of the treasury and to the commissioner of finance and administration. Any statement shall be approved by the comptroller of the treasury before it may be released for publication.

Acts 1937, ch. 278, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1939, ch. 11, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 12209.6 (Williams, § 12209.11); impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; Acts 1972, ch. 736, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-425; Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 17; 1996, ch. 564, § 2; 2003, ch. 187, § 6.

41-22-124. Expenditures for capital improvements.

If the TRICOR board deems it desirable to use the proceeds from sales, revenues or other funds obtained from the operation of TRICOR for the purchase or construction of buildings, roads, walls, driveways, equipment or other capital improvements, the board shall make a written request to the comptroller of the treasury and the governor to obtain an authorization to expend the funds for any of those purposes. The written request shall describe the improvement and the estimated cost of the improvement.

If the comptroller of the treasury and the governor approve the proposed expenditure, their approval shall be evidenced by endorsing their written approval upon the request and the same shall be the authority of the board to expend the funds for the improvement; provided, that it is unlawful to expend an amount greater than is stated in the approved request.

If the amount of the expenditure exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for buildings, walls or other capital improvements, the planning and construction of those improvements shall be under the requirements, direction and supervision of the state building commission.

Acts 1937, ch. 278, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1939, ch. 11, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 12209.6 (Williams, § 12209.11); Acts 1957, ch. 155, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-426; Acts 1994, ch. 737, §§ 18, 19; 1996, ch. 564, § 2; 2003, ch. 187, § 7.

41-22-125. Manufacture of license plates and similar articles.

The TRICOR board is authorized and empowered to manufacture numbered motor vehicle registration plates, highway and street signs and other kindred articles for the purpose of supplying the requirements of the state as provided in this part, and to sell to other cities, counties and states when deemed advisable by the board.

The necessary machinery and equipment shall be purchased, as all other supplies are purchased, so as to properly equip the plant, and the number of inmates necessary to operate the plant shall be employed.

Acts 1923, ch. 94, §§ 1, 2; Shan. Supp., § 7581a27; Code 1932, § 12208; Acts 1972, ch. 701, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 41-427, 41-428; Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 20; 1996, ch. 564, § 2.

41-22-126. Purchase of license plates.

The department of revenue is authorized and directed to contract for and purchase from the TRICOR board the requirements of the state for automobile number plates, to be paid for as if purchased from an individual dealer.

The controlling feature in making such contracts shall be reasonable returns to the institution manufacturing the goods and a saving to the state in supplying the plates.

Acts 1923, ch. 94, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 7581a28; mod. Code 1932, § 12209; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-429; Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 21; 1996, ch. 564, § 2.

41-22-127. State or local public works projects.

The commissioner of correction, with the approval of the governor and the appropriate commissioner, is authorized and directed to employ and work at state public works projects, such as the improvement, alteration, construction, repair or maintenance of state parks and highways, those inmates who, in the commissioner of correction's judgment, will be safe, humane, practicable or desirable to work outside the prison walls.

The commissioner of correction, with the approval of the governor, is authorized to employ and work such inmates as are safe and desirable to work outside the prison walls at county, city or municipal public works projects if, in the discretion of the commissioner, the county, city or municipality provides adequate supervision of inmates to ensure the safety of the general public and to prevent the escape of the inmates.

Any county, city or municipality desiring the use of inmates to perform public works projects shall make application to the commissioner of correction.

The application shall state:

The location and nature of the proposed project;

The estimated length of time inmates would be required;

The number of inmates that would be required; and

The nature of the duties inmates are to perform.

The application shall set out in detail the provisions for the supervision of the inmates. The provisions for supervision shall include the methods that will be used to ensure the health, safety and welfare of all inmates requested.

The commissioner may grant all or any part of the number of inmates requested, may deny the application or may place specific restrictions and conditions on the use of inmates, depending on the best interests of the state.

No inmate shall be required to perform public works projects for the state or any county, city or municipality if the project appears to the commissioner to be extremely dangerous to the health, safety or welfare of the inmate. Any project requiring the use of dynamite or any other explosive by an inmate is considered extremely dangerous for the purposes of this subsection (c).

Acts 1977, ch. 121, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-430.

41-22-128. Restrictions on release program facilities near schools, orphanages, child care centers, or similar establishments.

There shall be no community residential facilities that accommodate state or federal adult inmates who are on work release or other community release or prerelease programs established within one thousand feet (1,000') of a public or private school, orphanage, child care center, or any similar establishment where groups of children from nursery age to grade twelve attend or reside.

Subsection (a) applies only to counties having a population of seven hundred fifty thousand (750,000) or more, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and to counties having a metropolitan form of government.

Acts 1986, ch. 897, § 1; 2000, ch. 981, § 63.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

41-22-129. Substandard housing renovation.

The commissioner of correction, with the approval of the governor, is authorized to enter into cooperative agreements with county, city or municipal governments for the purpose of renovating substandard housing of persons determined by the department of human services to be of low income.

Any county, city or municipality desiring the use of inmates to perform such work shall make application to the commissioner of correction.

The application shall state:

The location and nature of the proposed project;

The estimated length of time inmates would be required;

The number of inmates that would be required; and

The nature of the duties inmates are to perform.

The application shall set out in detail the provisions for the supervision of the inmates. The provisions for supervision shall include the methods that will be used to ensure the health, safety and welfare of all inmates requested.

The commissioner may grant all or any part of the number of inmates requested, may deny the application or may place specific restrictions and conditions on the use of inmates, depending on the best interests of the state.

No inmate shall be required to perform work for any county, city or municipality if the project appears to the commissioner to be extremely dangerous to the health, safety or welfare of the inmate.

Acts 1987, ch. 241, § 1.

41-22-130. Inmate labor.

Subject to the conditions set out in subsection (b), the commissioner of correction is authorized to utilize inmate labor to construct, renovate or repair prison facilities, including time-building institutions, classification centers, alternative incarceration units and other buildings used for the housing or care of inmates.

Prior to using inmate labor for the purposes set out in subsection (a), the commissioner shall determine that the use will:

Result in a cost savings to the state;

Not compromise the safety of correction employees or the general public;

Not substantially increase the likelihood of escapes and other breaches of security or the introduction of dangerous contraband into prison facilities; and

Result in a finished product of a quality that is sufficient for the building being constructed, renovated or repaired.

The commissioner is authorized to make such rules, regulations or departmental policy as the commissioner deems advisable in connection with the use of inmate labor for the construction, renovation or repair of prison facilities.

Acts 1991, ch. 204, § 1.